Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 559. RENEWAL OF LICENSE TO PRACTICE PHARMACY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 559.001. EXPIRATION OF LICENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a license to practice pharmacy expires December 31 of each year or of every other year, as determined by the board.

(b) The board may adopt a system under which licenses to practice pharmacy expire on various dates during the year.

(c) If the board changes the expiration date of a license, the board shall prorate the license renewal fee to cover the months for which the license is valid for the year in which the date is changed. The total license renewal fee is due on the new expiration date.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.002. RENEWAL PERIOD. A license to practice pharmacy may be renewed for one or two years, as determined by the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.003. REQUIREMENTS FOR RENEWAL. (a) To renew a license to practice pharmacy, the license holder must before the expiration date of the license:

(1) pay a renewal fee as determined by the board;

(2) comply with the continuing education requirements prescribed by the board; and

(3) file with the board a completed application for a license renewal certificate that:

(A) is given under oath; and

(B) is accompanied by a certified statement executed by the license holder that attests that the license holder has satisfied the continuing education requirements during the preceding license period.

(b) A person whose license has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the expired license by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to one and one-half times the normally required renewal fee for the license.

(c) A person whose license has been expired for more than 90 days but less than one year may renew the expired license by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee for the license.

(d) A person whose license has been expired for one year or more may not renew the license. The person may obtain a new license by complying with the requirements and procedures for obtaining an original license, including the examination requirement.

(e) A person may not renew a license to practice pharmacy if the person holds a license to practice pharmacy in another state that has been suspended, revoked, canceled, or subject to an action that prohibits the person from practicing pharmacy in that state.

(f) The board may refuse to renew a license to practice pharmacy for a license holder who is in violation of a board order.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1254, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 559.004. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE RENEWAL CERTIFICATE. (a) The board shall issue a license renewal certificate to an applicant after the board has received, in a time prescribed by Section 559.003:

(1) the completed application;

(2) the renewal fee; and

(3) proof of completion of the continuing education requirements prescribed by Subchapter B.

(b) The renewal certificate must contain:

(1) the pharmacist's license number;

(2) the period for which the license is renewed; and

(3) other information the board determines necessary.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.005. ISSUANCE OF NEW LICENSE. (a) The board may issue a new license to practice pharmacy to a person who is prohibited under Section 559.003(d) from renewing a license if the person has not had a license granted by any other state restricted, suspended, revoked, canceled, or surrendered for any reason and qualifies under this section.

(b) A person qualifies for a license under this section if the person:

(1) was licensed as a pharmacist in this state, moved to another state, and is licensed and has been practicing pharmacy in the other state for the two years preceding the date the application for a new license is submitted;

(2) pays to the board an amount equal to the examination fee for the license; and

(3) passes the Texas Pharmacy Jurisprudence examination.

(c) A person qualifies for a license under this section if the person:

(1) was licensed as a pharmacist in this state;

(2) pays to the board an amount equal to the examination fee for the license; and

(3) passes the Texas Pharmacy Jurisprudence examination and any other examination required by the board and in addition to or instead of passing the examination as required by the board, participates in continuing pharmacy education and practices under conditions set by the board.

(d) A person qualifies for a license under this section if the person:

(1) submits to reexamination; and

(2) complies with the requirements and procedures for obtaining an original license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.006. LICENSE EXPIRATION NOTICE. At least 30 days before the expiration of a person's license, the board shall send written notice of the impending license expiration to the person at the license holder's last known address according to the board's records.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.007. PRACTICING PHARMACY WITHOUT RENEWAL CERTIFICATE. A person who practices pharmacy without a current license renewal certificate as required by this chapter is practicing pharmacy without a license and is subject to all penalties for practicing pharmacy without a license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. MANDATORY CONTINUING EDUCATION

Sec. 559.051. SATISFACTION OF CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENT. (a) A holder of a license to practice pharmacy may meet the continuing education requirement by:

(1) completing continuing education programs approved by the board; or

(2) passing a standardized pharmacy examination approved by the board.

(b) A license holder who takes the examination under Subsection (a)(2) must pay the examination fee assessed by the board under Section 554.006.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.052. RULES RELATING TO CONTINUING EDUCATION. (a) The board shall adopt rules relating to:

(1) the adoption or approval of mandatory continuing education programs;

(2) the approval of providers and the operation of continuing education programs; and

(3) the evaluation of the effectiveness of continuing education programs and a license holder's participation and performance in those programs.

(b) In establishing the requirement for continuing education, the board shall consider:

(1) factors that lead to the competent performance of professional duties; and

(2) the continuing education needs of license holders.

(c) In adopting rules relating to the approval of continuing education programs or providers, the board may consider:

(1) programs approved by the Texas Pharmacy Foundation; and

(2) providers approved by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education.

(d) The board shall approve home study courses, correspondence courses, or other similar programs.

(e) The board by rule may grant an extension for the completion of a continuing education requirement for good cause.

(f) The board by rule may exempt a person from all or part of the continuing education requirements.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.0525. CONTINUING EDUCATION RELATING TO OPIOID DRUGS. (a) The board shall develop a continuing education program regarding opioid drug abuse and the delivery, dispensing, and provision of tamper-resistant opioid drugs after considering input from interested persons.

(b) The board by rule may require a license holder to satisfy a number of the continuing education hours required by Section 559.053 through attendance of a program developed under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (S.B. 316), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 559.053. PROGRAM HOURS REQUIRED. A license holder satisfies the continuing education requirement by presenting evidence satisfactory to the board of completion of at least 30 hours of continuing education during the preceding 24 months of the person's license period.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1254, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.304(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 559.054. CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION. Each continuing education program approved by the board shall issue a certificate of completion to a license holder who satisfactorily completes the program.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.055. RECORDS. Each license holder shall maintain records for three years showing the continuing education programs completed by the license holder.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.056. DEMONSTRATION OF COMPLIANCE. On an audit by the board, a license holder is in compliance with the continuing education requirements if the license holder submits to the board:

(1) an affidavit stating that the license holder has complied with those requirements; and

(2) records showing completion of the continuing education programs.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER C. INACTIVE STATUS

Sec. 559.101. ELIGIBILITY FOR INACTIVE STATUS. The board by rule shall adopt a system for placing on inactive status a license held by a person who:

(1) is licensed by the board to practice pharmacy;

(2) is not eligible to renew the license because of failure to comply with the continuing education requirements under Subchapter B; and

(3) is not practicing pharmacy in this state.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.102. RESTRICTION ON LENGTH OF INACTIVE STATUS. The board may restrict the length of time a license may remain on inactive status.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.103. APPLICATION FOR INACTIVE STATUS. A license holder may place the holder's license on inactive status by:

(1) applying for inactive status on a form prescribed by the board before the expiration date of the license; and

(2) complying with all other requirements for renewal of a license other than the continuing education requirements under Subchapter B.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.104. RETURN TO ACTIVE STATUS. A holder of a license that is on inactive status may return the license to active status by:

(1) applying for active status on a form prescribed by the board; and

(2) providing evidence satisfactory to the board that the license holder has completed the number of hours of continuing education, up to 36 hours, that would otherwise have been required for renewal of the license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 559.105. PRACTICING PHARMACY DURING INACTIVE STATUS. (a) A holder of a license that is on inactive status may not practice pharmacy in this state.

(b) A license holder who practices pharmacy while the holder's license is on inactive status is practicing pharmacy without a license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.